District of Columbia statutes.
1-616.53

Grievances.

(a)

The Mayor, the District of Columbia Board of Education, and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia shall issue rules and regulations providing procedures for the prompt handling of grievances of employees and applicants for employment. The grievance system shall be made known to all employees and shall provide for an alternative dispute resolution mechanism. The grievance system shall provide for the expeditious adjustment of grievances and complaints.

(b)

Except when an employee is grieving a disciplinary action pursuant to § 1-616.52, no employee or applicant shall present a grievance pursuant to this section more than 45 days, not including Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays, after the date that the employee knew or should have known of the act or occurrence that is the subject of the grievance.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1653
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(s), 45 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 1-603.01 and § 1-616.52.
1981 Ed., § 1-617.53.
Applicability of § 101(s) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-616.51.